Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-1110
Consumer right; waiver or limitation; unenforceable.

Any provision of a contract or agreement that waives or limits in any way a consumer right described in sections 87-1107 to 87-1109 is contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable.

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 10.
January 1, 2025